Maryland, session 2025, SB0789.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
11–1701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Emergency assistance” means immediate direct assistance provided by a
hunger–free campus to any student facing an unanticipated financial crisis or hardship.
(c) “Hunger–free campus” means a campus of any 4–year [public] institution of
higher education or regional higher education center that meets the requirements of §
11–1703(a) of this subtitle or any 2–year [public] institution of higher education that meets
the requirements of § 11–1703(b) of this subtitle.
(d) “Program” means the Hunger–Free Campus Grant Program.
– 1 –

Ch. 322 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
11–1702.
(a) There is a Hunger–Free Campus Grant Program.
(b) The purpose of the Program is to:
(1) Address student hunger;
(2) Leverage more sustainable solutions to address basic food needs on
campus;
(3) Raise awareness of services currently offered on campus that address
basic food needs; and
(4) Build strategic partnerships at the local, State, and national levels to
address food insecurity among students.
(c) (1) The Commission shall administer the Program.
(2) The Commission shall develop the form to be used for the annual
student survey required under § 11–1703 of this subtitle.
11–1703.
(a) The Commission shall designate as a hunger–free campus any campus of a
4–year [public] institution of higher education or regional higher education center that:
(1) Has established a hunger task force that:
(i) Meets at least three times per academic year; and
(ii) Sets at least two goals with action plans;
(2) Has designated a staff member responsible for:
(i) Assisting students in enrolling in the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program; or
(ii) Connecting students with available Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program outreach partners that can assist students in enrolling in the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program;
(3) Has designated a staff member responsible for informing students
participating in federal work–study programs that they are eligible for the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 322
(4) (i) Provides options for students to utilize Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program benefits at campus retailers; or
(ii) Provides students with information on the names and locations
of off–campus retailers that accept Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits;
(5) Participates in an awareness day campaign activity and plans at least
one campus awareness event during the National Hunger and Homelessness Awareness
Week;
(6) Provides at least one food pantry on campus, or enables students in
need to receive food through a separate, stigma–free arrangement;
(7) Develops and maintains a meal–sharing program that allows students
to donate their unused meal plan credits to be distributed to students in need for use in
campus dining halls or at an on–campus food pantry, if applicable;
(8) Conducts a standardized annual student survey on hunger and submits
the results to the Commission; and
(9) Submits an annual report detailing its efforts to address student
hunger to the Commission.
(b) The Commission shall designate as a hunger–free campus any campus of a
2–year [public] institution of higher education that meets all of the requirements for
4–year [public] institutions of higher education or regional higher education centers
identified in subsection (a) of this section, with the exception of the requirements in
subsection (a)(4) and (7) of this section.
(c) (1) Each 4–year [public] institution of higher education may develop its
own procedures for a meal–sharing program.
(2) The 4–year [public] institutions of higher education shall make
information about the meal–sharing program publicly available, including:
(i) How a student may donate unused meal plan credits;
(ii) How a student in need may apply to receive donated meal plan
credits; and
(iii) The methodology that a 4–year [public] institution of higher
education uses to ensure that unused donated meal plan credits are used to purchase food
to support an on–campus food pantry, if applicable.
11–1704.
– 3 –

Ch. 322 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) For fiscal [year 2023 and each fiscal year thereafter] YEARS 2023 THROUGH
2026, the Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $150,000
for the Program.
(B) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF
$250,000 FOR THE PROGRAM.
11–1705.
(a) (1) The Commission shall allocate grant funding to any 4–year or 2–year
public institution of higher education or regional higher education center that:
[(1)] (I) Pledges a matching contribution to be used to implement the
goals of the Program; and
[(2)] (II) Is designated as a hunger–free campus.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING DESIGNATION AS A HUNGER–FREE CAMPUS
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, A 4–YEAR OR 2–YEAR PRIVATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION OR A REGIONAL HIGHER EDUCATION CENTER OPERATED BY A PRIVATE
NONPROFIT INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IS NOT ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE
GRANT FUNDING UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(b) The Commission shall determine the amount of each grant.
(c) The Commission shall incorporate into the 2026–2030 State Plan for Higher
Education a plan for addressing any basic needs insecurity of higher education students.
(d) (1) The Commission shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the
requirements of this subtitle.
(2) The regulations adopted under this subsection shall allow grant
recipients to use grant funds flexibly to implement the goals of the Program, including
giving recipients the ability to:
(i) Support emergency assistance;
(ii) Hire staff to manage initiatives related to the Program; and
(iii) Use grant funds for operational activities related to the Program.
11–1706.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 322
(a) Not later than 2 years after establishing the Program, the Commission shall
report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article,
the General Assembly on the implementation of this subtitle.
(b) The report shall include:
(1) The number and amounts of grants awarded;
(2) The impact of the Program on establishing hunger–free campuses at
[public] institutions of higher education and regional higher education centers;
(3) The impact of awarded grants on reducing the number of students
experiencing food insecurity; and
(4) Recommendations on expanding the Program.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 5 –